North Carolina, session 2025, HB587.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of two million dollars
($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be provided in the form of a
grant to The Salvation Army to be used for the construction of the Corps Community Center in
Wilmington by the Salvation Army of Cape Fear.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H587-v-1*